Utah statutes.
53-10-210.   Response for requests -- Fees.

(1)  In responding to requests for criminal background checks, the division shall make an earnest effort to provide the requested information within three weeks of receipt of a request.

(2)  Fees and other payments received by the division in payment for criminal background check services shall be deposited in the General Fund and the Legislature shall make an annual appropriation for payment of personnel and other costs incurred in providing those services.

